Tennessee, session 114, SB2467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsections (a), (e), and (g) and subdivision (h)(1)(B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307(f)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence, as
defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, within the prior five (5) years, and has not had the person's
firearm rights restored pursuant to § 39-17-1367, or is still subject to the disabilities of
such a conviction;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307(f)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(C) Is prohibited from possessing a firearm under any other state or federal law;
provided, however, that a person is not prohibited from possessing a firearm based
solely on:
(i) The person's status as an unlawful user of or a person who is addicted
to any controlled substance unless a court has issued a finding that the person's
substance use creates a material risk of dangerous conduct within the prior one
(1) year; or
SB2467
010956
- 1 -

(ii) The person's prior conviction for a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence, if the conviction occurred more than five (5) years prior or if the
person's firearm rights have been restored pursuant to § 39-17-1367.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307(h)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Has been convicted of stalking, as prohibited by § 39-17-315, within the prior
five (5) years;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307(h)(1)(D), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(D) Is otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm by 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) as it
existed on January 1, 2021; provided, however, that a person is not prohibited from
carrying a firearm based solely on:
(i) The person's status as an unlawful user of or a person who is addicted
to any controlled substance unless a court has issued a finding that the person's
substance use creates a material risk of dangerous conduct within the prior one
(1) year; or
(ii) The person's prior conviction for a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence, if the conviction occurred more than five (5) years prior or if the
person's firearm rights have been restored pursuant to § 39-17-1367.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1311, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
It is not an offense for a person authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to § 39-17-
1351 or § 39-17-1366 or a person who is not prohibited from carrying a firearm to do so
in any state or local park, on a greenway or other recreational property, or, to the extent
- 2 - 010956

permitted by federal law, within or on property designated by the federal government as
a national park, forest, preserve, historic park, military park, trail, or recreation area.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i)(v).
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(i)(w) and (a)(2)(B)(i)(x) and substituting:
(w) Firearm possession, as defined in § 39-17-1319;
(x) Providing firearms to juveniles, as defined in § 39-17-1320; or
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1303, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b).
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1308, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2) and subdivisions (a)(6)-(11).
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting the language "pursuant to § 39-17-1307(g)".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1).
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319, is amended by deleting
the word "handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(d)(1)(D), is amended
by deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(D) Hunting, trapping, fishing, camping, sport shooting, or other lawful sporting
activity;
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(d)(1), is amended by
adding the following new subdivisions:
(I) By a juvenile possessing a rifle or shotgun, at the juvenile's:
- 3 - 010956

(i) Place of residence;
(ii) Place of business; or
(iii) Premises;
(J) By a juvenile possessing a rifle or shotgun while engaged in the lawful
protection of livestock from predatory animals; or
(K) Emancipated, pursuant to title 29, chapter 31.
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1320, is amended by deleting
the word "handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1321, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) Notwithstanding whether a person has a permit issued pursuant to § 39-17-
1315 or § 39-17-1351 or § 39-17-1366, it is an offense to carry a firearm while under the
influence of alcohol as defined in § 55-10-401(2) or any controlled substance or
substance analogue.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) In addition to the punishment authorized by subsection (b) if the violation
occurs in an establishment where liquor, wine, or other alcoholic beverages, as defined
in § 57-3-101(a), or beer, as defined in § 57-6-102, are served for consumption on the
premises, and the person has a handgun carry permit issued pursuant to § 39-17-1351
or § 39-17-1366, such permit shall be suspended in accordance with § 39-17-1352 for a
period of three (3) years.
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(f), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(f) Except as provided in subsection (g), this section shall not apply to the
grounds of any public park, natural area, historic park, nature trail, campground, forest,
- 4 - 010956

greenway, waterway, or other similar public place that is owned or operated by the state,
a county, a municipality, or instrumentality thereof.
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(g)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the language "or § 39-17-1311(b)(1)(H)(ii)".
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1364, is amended by deleting
the language "Notwithstanding § 39-17-1307, or any other law," and substituting
"Notwithstanding another law to the contrary,".
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051(b)(2)(H), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (b)(2)(I) and (b)(2)(J) and substituting:
(I) Firearm possession, as defined in § 39-17-1319;
(J) Providing firearm to juveniles, as defined in § 39-17-1320; or
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended
by adding the following new section:
39-17-1367.
(a) A person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, within the prior five (5) years may petition the
court in which the person was convicted of the offense to have the person's firearm
rights restored; provided, that the person may not petition the court until three (3) years
from the date of conviction.
(b) A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the district attorney
general of the judicial district in which the offense occurred. The district attorney general
may appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the
petitioner.
- 5 - 010956

(c) The court shall receive and consider evidence in an open proceeding,
including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:
(1) Evidence of the offense and the circumstances surrounding the
offense;
(2) The petitioner's mental health records;
(3) The petitioner's criminal history;
(4) The petitioner's reputation; and
(5) Changes in the petitioner's circumstances relevant to the relief
sought.
(d) The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the
evidence and enters into the record the following:
(1) The petitioner is no longer likely to act in a manner that is dangerous
to public safety; and
(2) Granting the relief would not be contrary to the public interest.
(e) A record of the proceedings, to be provided by the petitioner, shall be made
by a certified court reporter or by court-approved electronic means.
(f) The petitioner may appeal a final order denying the requested relief, and the
review on appeal, if granted, shall be de novo.
(g) A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once.
(h) Relief from a firearm disability granted under this section has no effect on the
loss of civil rights, including firearm rights, for any reason other than the particular
misdemeanor crime of domestic violence from which relief is granted.
(i) When the court issues an order granting a petition of relief under subsection
(d), the court clerk shall, as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after
- 6 - 010956

issuance, forward a copy of the order to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI).
The TBI, upon receipt of the order, shall:
(1) Immediately forward a copy of the order to the department of safety;
(2) If applicable, update the National Instant Criminal Background Check
System database and transmit the corrected records to the federal bureau of
investigation; and
(3) Remove and destroy all records relating to the petition for relief from
any database over which the TBI exercises control.
(j) The TBI and the department of safety shall not use or permit the use of the
records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not
specified in this section.
SECTION 24. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 7 - 010956